Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-958.01
Noxious Weed and
Invasive Plant Species Assistance Fund; created; use; investment.

The Noxious Weed and Invasive Plant Species Assistance Fund
is created. The fund may be used to carry out the purposes of section 2-958.02.
The State Treasurer shall credit to the fund any funds transferred or appropriated to the fund
by the Legislature and
funds received as gifts or grants or other private or public funds obtained
for the purposes set forth in section 2-958.02. Any money in the fund available
for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant
to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

Laws 2004, LB 869, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB961, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB98, § 1.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.